Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2288.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of December 17, 1968 (P.L.1224, No.387), known as the Unfair Trade Practices and Consumer Protection Law, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 9.5. Artificial Intelligence Training Disclosure.--(a) A platform that collects user-generated content for the purpose of training artificial intelligence algorithms shall disclose to the user that the user-generated content may be used for the purpose of training artificial intelligence.(b) The disclosure shall be presented to the user at the time the user signs up for the platform and shall be separate 12345678910111213141516171819 from the platform's terms of service agreement.(c) Each user of a platform must acknowledge receipt of the disclosure before being allowed to post user-generated content on the platform.(d) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Artificial intelligence" means as defined in 18 Pa.C.S. § 3131 (relating to unlawful dissemination of intimate image)."Platform" means an application, Internet website or other interface where user-generated content may be collected for the purpose of training artificial intelligence."User-generated content" means any form of content, such as videos, text or images, created by a user rather than by the platform.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20260HB2288PN2997 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516